Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1071.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 32-2606, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE32-2606. Exceptions This chapter does not apply to: 1. An officer or employee of the federal government, this state or a political subdivision of this state while the officer or employee is performing official duties. 2. An individual who performs security related work at: (a) A commercial nuclear generating station that is subject to federal regulatory requirements. (b) A company that is subject to department of defense regulatory requirements. 3. A company that employs security guards solely for use of and service to itself and not for others and that complies with the following requirements: (a) If the companys security guards are armed, each guard must complete sixteen hours of firearms training initially and complete an additional eight hours of refresher training each year thereafter. (b) If the security guard wears a uniform or badge, the uniform or badge must strictly conform to the standards established by the department pursuant to this chapter. (c) The company must annually submit an affidavit to the department that attests to the companys compliance with its internal procedures that require a background investigation for each of its security guards. 4. The Arizona rangers organization as identified in section 41-4201, or authorized persons performing official Arizona ranger duties when in the service of a nonprofit organization recognized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Repeal A. Title 41, chapter 5, article 4, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed. B. Title 41, chapter 40, Arizona Revised Statutes, is repealed.